Utah statutes.
19-1-106.   Boards within department.

(1)  The following policymaking boards are created within the department:

(a)  the Air Quality Board, appointed under Section 19-2-103;

(b)  the Radiation Control Board, appointed under Section 19-3-103;

(c)  the Drinking Water Board, appointed under Section 19-4-103;

(d)  the Water Quality Board, appointed under Section 19-5-103; and

(e)  the Solid and Hazardous Waste Control Board, appointed under Section 19-6-103.

(2)  The authority of the boards created in Subsection (1) is limited to the specific authority granted them under this title.

